Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.010

Definitions.

(1) "Birthing center" or "childbirth center" means any health facility, not part of a hospital or in a hospital, that provides facilities and staff to support a birth service to low-risk maternity clients: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this chapter shall not apply to any hospital approved by the American College of Surgeons, American Osteopathic Association, or its successor.

(2) "Department" means the state department of health.

(3) "Immediate jeopardy" means a situation in which the birthing center's noncompliance with one or more statutory or regulatory requirements has placed the health and safety of patients in its care at risk for serious injury, serious harm, serious impairment, or death.

(4) "Low-risk" means normal, uncomplicated prenatal course as determined by adequate prenatal care and prospects for a normal uncomplicated birth as defined by reasonable and generally accepted criteria of maternal and fetal health.

(5) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, or joint stock association, and the legal successor thereof.

[ 2024 c 121 s 1; 2000 c 93 s 30; 1991 c 3 s 100; 1985 c 213 s 8; 1979 c 141 s 32; 1951 c 168 s 2. Prior: 1943 c 214 s 1; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6130-47.]

NOTES:

Savings—Effective date—1985 c 213: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.